Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1311
Enforcement of judgment.

Such judgment shall authorize the same proceedings for its enforcement as judgments rendered in actions regularly brought and prosecuted; and the confession shall operate as a release of errors.

R.S.1867, Code § 435, p. 466;

R.S.1913, § 8004;

C.S.1922, § 8945;

C.S.1929, § 20-1311;

R.S.1943, § 25-1311.